South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S572.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Attorney General, relating to Money Services, designated as Regulation Document Number 5363, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The Office of the Attorney General proposes to repeal certain regulations previously adopted under the South Carolina Anti-Money Laundering Act. The amended South Carolina Money Services Act (S.C. Code Ann. Â§35-11-100, et seq.) has recently been adopted, which rendered these regulations no longer necessary or appropriate. The Notice of Drafting regarding this regulation was published on September 27, 2024, in the State Register. ----XX----